dictsource/he_rules
.group m
	m	_^_en
	?1 m	m


.group n
	n	_^_en
	?1 n	n


.group o
	o	_^_en
	?1 o	o


.group ou
	ou	_^_en
	?1 ou	u


.group oo
	oo	_^_en
	?1 oo	u@
	?1 oo (o


.group p
	p	_^_en
	?1 p	p


.group ph
	ph	_^_en



.group q
	q	_^_en
	?1 q	q1


.group r
	r	_^_en
	?1 r	R


.group s
	s	_^_en
	?1 s	s


.group sh
	sh	_^_en
	?1 sh	S


.group t
	t	_^_en
	?1 t	t


.group th
	th	_^_en



.group u
	u	_^_en
	?1 u	u


.group v
	v	_^_en
	?1 v	v


.group w
	w	_^_en
	?1 w	w


.group x
	x	_^_en
	?1 x	ks


.group y
	y	_^_en
	?1 y	j


.group z
	z	_^_en
	?1 z	z


// Others mathematics characters
.group
	 . (D     	noq1te:
	±	plus||minus
	>=	gad@ol||o@||Save
	<=	kat@an||o@||Save
